Hawaii statutes.
[§142-112] Aviary game bird permits.
The department shall issue an aviary game bird permit to any person who raises
aviary game birds and shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to effectuate
this part. [L 1989, c 9, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next